Vermont statutes. Title 11C Mutual Benefit Enterprises
Article 17. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 1701.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.

§ 1702.
Relation to electronic signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This title modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act,

15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)

or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act,

15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.

§ 1703.
Savings clause.

This title does not affect an action or proceeding commenced, or right accrued, before the effective date.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 20, 2012.